Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 7. Transfer and Waiver.
§ 16.1-272.
Power of circuit court over juvenile offender.

In any case in which a juvenile is indicted, the offense for which he is indicted and all ancillary charges shall be tried in the same manner as provided for in the trial of adults, except as otherwise provided with regard to sentencing. Upon a finding of guilty of any charge, the court shall fix the sentence without the intervention of a jury. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a court to review the results of an investigation completed pursuant to §

16.1-273

.

If a juvenile is convicted of a violent juvenile felony, for that offense and for all ancillary crimes the court may order that (i) the juvenile serve a portion of the sentence as a serious juvenile offender under §

16.1-285.1

and the remainder of such sentence in the same manner as provided for adults; (ii) the juvenile serve the entire sentence in the same manner as provided for adults; or (iii) the portion of the sentence to be served in the same manner as provided for adults be suspended conditioned upon successful completion of such terms and conditions as may be imposed in a juvenile court upon disposition of a delinquency case including, but not limited to, commitment under subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or §

16.1-285.1

.

If the juvenile is convicted of any other felony, the court may sentence or commit the juvenile offender in accordance with the criminal laws of this Commonwealth or may in its discretion deal with the juvenile in the manner prescribed in this chapter for the hearing and disposition of cases in the juvenile court, including, but not limited to, commitment under §

16.1-285.1

or may in its discretion impose an adult sentence and suspend the sentence conditioned upon successful completion of such terms and conditions as may be imposed in a juvenile court upon disposition of a delinquency case.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the juvenile is convicted of any felony, the court may in its discretion depart from any mandatory minimum sentence required by law or suspend any portion of an otherwise applicable sentence.

If the juvenile is not convicted of a felony but is convicted of a misdemeanor, the court shall deal with the juvenile in the manner prescribed by law for the disposition of a delinquency case in the juvenile court.

If the circuit court decides to deal with the juvenile in the same manner as a case in the juvenile court and places the juvenile on probation, the juvenile may be supervised by a juvenile probation officer.

Whether the court sentences and commits the juvenile as a juvenile under this chapter or under the criminal law, in cases where the juvenile is convicted of a felony in violation of §

18.2-61

,

18.2-63

,

18.2-64.1

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.2

,

18.2-67.3

,

18.2-67.5

,

18.2-370

or

18.2-370.1

or, where the victim is a minor or is physically helpless or mentally incapacitated as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, subsection B of §

18.2-361

or subsection B of §

18.2-366

, the clerk shall make the report required by §

19.2-390

to the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry established pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1.

In any case in which a juvenile is not sentenced as a juvenile under this chapter, the court shall, in addition to considering any other factor and prior to imposing a sentence, consider (i) the juvenile’s exposure to adverse childhood experiences, early childhood trauma, or any child welfare agency and (ii) the differences between juvenile and adult offenders.

A juvenile sentenced pursuant to clause (i) of subdivision A 1 shall be eligible to earn sentence credits in the manner prescribed by §

53.1-202.2

for the portion of the sentence served as a serious juvenile offender under §

16.1-285.1

.

If the court sentences the juvenile as a juvenile under this chapter, the clerk shall provide a copy of the court’s final order or judgment to the court service unit in the same locality as the juvenile court to which the case had been transferred.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-177; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1994, c. 362; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, c. 793; 2002, c. 511; 2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 590; 2007, c. 460; 2008, c. 517; 2014, cc. 20, 249; 2020, c. 396.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2014, cc. 20 and
249, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2014.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “In the hearing and disposition of felony cases properly before a circuit court having criminal jurisdiction of such offenses if committed by an adult, the court, after giving the juvenile the right to a trial by jury on the issue of guilt or innocence and upon a finding of guilty, may sentence or commit the juvenile offender in accordance with the criminal laws of this Commonwealth or may in its discretion deal with the juvenile in the manner prescribed in this law for the hearing and disposition of cases in the juvenile court,” added subdivisions A 1 and A 3, inserted the subdivision A 2 designation, in present subdivision A 2, inserted “If the juvenile is convicted of any other felony the court” preceding “may sentence,” substituted “this chapter” for “this law,” and inserted “including, but not limited to, commitment under §

16.1-285.1

” following “disposition of cases in the juvenile court” and, in subsections B and C, substituted “juvenile” for “child” in three places.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 793 added “including, but not limited to, commitment under subdivision 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or §

16.1-285.1

” at the end of subdivision A 1; and added the language following “under §

16.1-285.1

” through the end of subdivision A 2.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 511, in subdivision A 1, substituted “for that offense . . .
adults be suspended” for “the sentence for that offense and for all ancillary crimes shall be fixed by the court in the same manner as provided for adults, but the sentence may be suspended.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 584 substituted “Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry established pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” for “Sex Offender Registry established pursuant to §

19.2-390.1

” at the end of subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 590 added subsection D; and made a stylistic change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 460 deleted “other than capital murder” near the middle of the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 517 added subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 20 and 249, effective October 1, 2014, are identical, and in subsection A, added the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 396 added subdivision A 3 and subsection D and made related redesignation changes.

Law Review.

For a review of Virginia legal issues involving children, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1001 (1999).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 59 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 72; 6B M.J. Drugs & Druggists, § 5; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 13.

§ 16.1-272.1.
Claim of error to be raised within one year.

In addition to any other curative provisions, waivers, procedural defaults, or requirements for timely objection, including but not limited to those in subsection J of §

16.1-241

, subsection E of §

16.1-269.1

and subsection E of §

16.1-269.6

, any claim of error or defect under this chapter, jurisdictional or otherwise, that is not raised within one year from the date of final judgment of the circuit court or one year from the effective date of this act, whichever is later, shall not constitute a ground for relief in any judicial proceeding.

History.

2000, c. 418.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the enactment of §§

16.1-272.1

and 16.1-272.2 by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.